Massachusetts, session 194th, S1666.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after Section 30 the
following new section:-
Section 30B. Cooperation with Federal Agencies on Criminal Matters.
The executive office of housing and livable communities shall cooperate with federal law
enforcement agencies, including the united states citizenship and immigration services and the
united states immigration and customs enforcement, to report and coordinate the immediate
detainment of any nonresident migrant or asylum seeker in the Commonwealth who has been
formally charged with or convicted of a serious crime, including but not limited to rape, murder,
drug trafficking, and felony theft, as defined by state and federal law.
of 1